en: Bullhorns
xx: Bullhorns
cs: Megafony
da: Megafoner
de: Megafone
es: Megáfonos
fr: Porte-voix
it: Megafoni
ja: 拡声器
nl: Megafoons
no: Megafoner
pl: Megafony
pt: Megafones elétricos
ru: Мегафоны
sv: Megafoner med förstärkare
tr: Megafonlar

en: DJ & Specialty Audio
xx: DJ & Specialty Audio
cs: Speciální zvukové vybavení a DJ
da: DJ- og speciallyd
de: DJ- & Spezialaudiogeräte
es: DJ y audio especializado
fr: Équipement de DJ
it: Audio per DJ e specialisti
ja: DJ用特殊オーディオ
nl: Audio voor DJ's en speciaal gebruik
no: DJ og spesiallyd
pl: Audio dla DJ-ów i specjalistyczne
pt: Equipamentos de áudio para DJ
ru: Профессиональные и DJ-аудиосистемы
sv: DJ- och specialistljud
tr: DJ ve Uzman Ses Sistemleri

en: DJ CD Players
xx: DJ CD Players
cs: Přehrávače CD pro DJ
da: DJ cd-afspillere
de: DJ CD-Player
es: Reproductores de CD para DJ
fr: Lecteurs CD de DJ
it: Lettori CD DJ
ja: DJ用CDプレーヤー
nl: CD-spelers voor DJ's
no: DJ-CD-spillere
pl: Odtwarzacze CD dla DJ-ów
pt: CD players para DJ
ru: DJ CD-плееры
sv: CD-spelare för DJ:s
tr: DJ CD Çalarları

en: DJ Systems
xx: DJ Systems
cs: DJ systémy
da: DJ-systemer
de: DJ Systeme
es: Sistemas DJ
fr: Tables de mixage
it: Sistemi per DJ
ja: DJシステム
nl: DJ-systemen
no: DJ-anlegg
pl: Systemy dla DJ-ów
pt: Sistemas para DJ
ru: DJ-системы
sv: DJ-system
tr: DJ Sistemleri

en: Public Address Systems
xx: Public Address Systems
cs: Reproboxy
da: PA-systemer
de: Beschallungsanlagen
es: Megafonía
fr: Systèmes de sonorisation
it: Sistemi di altoparlanti
ja: PAシステム
nl: PA-systemen
no: Høyttaleranlegg
pl: Systemy PA
pt: Sistemas de alto-falantes
ru: Системы громкой связи
sv: PA-utrustning
tr: Anons Sistemleri

en: Stage Equipment
xx: Stage Equipment
cs: Pódiové vybavení
da: Sceneudstyr
de: Bühnenausstattung
es: Equipos para escenario
fr: Matériel de scène
it: Attrezzature da palco
ja: ステージ機器
nl: Toneelapparatuur
no: Sceneutstyr
pl: Sprzęt sceniczny
pt: Equipamento de palco
ru: Сценическое оборудование
sv: Scenutrustning
tr: Sahne Ekipmanları

en: Wireless Transmitters
xx: Wireless Transmitters
cs: Bezdrátové vysílače
da: Trådløse sendere
de: Drahtlossender
es: Transmisores inalámbricos
fr: Systèmes de communication sans fil
it: Trasmettitori wireless
ja: ワイヤレストランスミッター
nl: Draadloze zenders
no: Trådløse sendere
pl: Transmitery bezprzewodowe
pt: Transmissores sem fio
ru: Беспроводные передатчики
sv: Trådlösa sändare
tr: Kablosuz Vericiler

en: Circuit Boards & Components
xx: Circuit Boards & Components
cs: Plošné spoje a součástky
da: Kredsløb og komponenter
de: Elektronische Leiterplatten & Bauteile
es: Componentes y placas de circuitos
fr: Circuits imprimés et composants de circuits
it: Circuiti stampati e componenti
ja: 回路部品
nl: Printplaten en componenten
no: Kretskort og -komponenter
pl: Płyty drukowane i komponenty
pt: Componentes e placas de circuitos
ru: Печатные платы и их компоненты
sv: Kretskort och kretskomponenter
tr: Devre Kartları ve Bileşenleri

en: Circuit Board Accessories
xx: Circuit Board Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k deskám s plošnými spoji
da: Tilbehør til kredsløb
de: Leiterplattenzubehör
es: Accesorios para placas de circuito
fr: Accessoires pour circuits imprimés
it: Accessori per circuiti stampati
ja: 基板用アクセサリー
nl: Accessoires voor printplaten
no: Tilbehør til kretskort
pl: Akcesoria do płyt drukowanych
pt: Acessórios para placas de circuito
ru: Принадлежности для печатных плат
sv: Tillbehör för kretskort
tr: Devre Kartı Aksesuarları

en: Circuit Decoders & Encoders
xx: Circuit Decoders & Encoders
cs: Kodéry a dekodéry
da: Kredsløbskodere og -indkodere
de: Decoder & Encoder für Schaltkreise
es: Descodificadores y codificadores de circuitos
fr: Décodeurs et codeurs
it: Codificatori e decodificatori per circuiti
ja: 回路デコーダー・エンコーダー
nl: Circuitdecoders en -encoders
no: Kretsdekodere og -kodere
pl: Układy kodujące i dekodujące
pt: Decodificadores e codificadores de circuito
ru: Электронные шифраторы и дешифраторы
sv: Avkodare och kodare
tr: Devre Kod Çözücüler ve Kodlayıcılar

en: Circuit Prototyping
xx: Circuit Prototyping
cs: Vývoj elektrických obvodů
da: Kredsløbsprototyping
de: Platinenentwicklung
es: Prototipos de circuitos
fr: Prototypes de circuit
it: Prototipazione circuiti
ja: 回路試作
nl: Prototypen printplaten
no: Kretsprototyper
pl: Prototypowanie obwodów
pt: Prototipação de circuitos
ru: Прототипные печатные платы
sv: Prototypframställning av kretskort
tr: Devre Prototipi Oluşturma

en: Breadboards
xx: Breadboards
cs: Nepájivá kontaktní pole
da: Breadboards
de: Steckplatinen
es: Placas de pruebas
fr: Maquettes électriques
it: Breadboard
ja: ブレッドボード
nl: Breadboards
no: Prototypekort
pl: Płytki prototypowe
pt: Tábuas para pão
ru: Макетные платы
sv: Kopplingsdäck
tr: Deneysel Devreler

en: Electronic Filters
xx: Electronic Filters
cs: Elektronické filtry
da: Elektroniske filtre
de: Elektronische Filter
es: Filtros electrónicos
fr: Filtres électroniques
it: Filtri elettronici
ja: 電子フィルタ
nl: Elektronische filters
no: Elektroniske filtre
pl: Filtry elektroniczne
pt: Filtros eletrônicos
ru: Электронные фильтры
sv: Elektroniska filter
tr: Elektronik Filtreler

en: Passive Circuit Components
xx: Passive Circuit Components
cs: Pasivní elektronické součástky
da: Passive kredsløbskomponenter
de: Passive elektronische Bauelemente
es: Elementos pasivos de circuitos
fr: Composants de circuits passifs
it: Componenti passivi circuiti
ja: 受動回路部品
nl: Passieve componenten
no: Passive kretskomponenter
pl: Elementy pasywne obwodów
pt: Componentes de circuito passivo
ru: Пассивные компоненты электрических цепей
sv: Komponenter för passiva kretsar
tr: Pasif Devre Bileşenleri

en: Capacitors
xx: Capacitors
cs: Kondenzátory
da: Kondensatorer
de: Kondensatoren
es: Condensadores
fr: Condensateurs
it: Condensatori
ja: コンデンサ
nl: Condensatoren
no: Kondensatorer
pl: Kondensatory
pt: Capacitadores
ru: Электрические конденсаторы
sv: Kondensatorer
tr: Kondansatörler

en: Electronic Oscillators
xx: Electronic Oscillators
cs: Elektronické oscilátory
da: Elektroniske oscillatorer
de: Oszillatoren
es: Osciladores electrónicos
fr: Oscillateurs électroniques
it: Oscillatori elettronici
ja: 発振回路
nl: Elektronische oscillators
no: Elektriske oscillatorer
pl: Oscylatory elektroniczne
pt: Osciladores eletrônicos
ru: Электронные осцилляторы
sv: Elektroniska oscillatorer
tr: Elektronik Osilatörler

en: Inductors
xx: Inductors
cs: Indukčnosti
da: Induktionsspoler
de: Induktoren
es: Inductores
fr: Inducteurs
it: Induttori
ja: インダクタ
nl: Inductorspoelen
no: Induktorer
pl: Elementy indukcyjne
pt: Indutores
ru: Индукторы
sv: Induktansspolar
tr: İndüktörler

en: Resistors
xx: Resistors
cs: Rezistory
da: Modstande
de: Widerstände
es: Resistencias
fr: Résistances
it: Resistori
ja: 抵抗器
nl: Weerstanden
no: Motstander
pl: Rezystory
pt: Resistores
ru: Резисторы
sv: Motstånd
tr: Dirençler

en: Printed Circuit Boards
xx: Printed Circuit Boards
cs: Desky s plošnými spoji
da: Printkort
de: Leiterplatten
es: Tarjetas de circuito impreso
fr: Circuits imprimés
it: Schede per circuiti stampati
ja: プリント基板
nl: Printplaten (PCB's)
no: Kretskort
pl: Obwody drukowane
pt: Placas de circuito impresso
ru: Печатные платы
sv: Mönsterkort
tr: Baskılı Devre Kartı

en: Camera Circuit Boards
xx: Camera Circuit Boards
cs: Desky s plošnými spoji pro kamery
da: Printkort til kameraer
de: Kamera-Leiterplatten
es: Placas de circuitos para cámaras
fr: Cartes de circuits imprimés pour appareils photo
it: Circuiti stampati per fotocamere
ja: カメラ用回路基板
nl: Printplaten voor camera's
no: Kretskort til kameraer
pl: Obwody drukowane do aparatów i kamer
pt: Placas de circuito para câmeras
ru: Печатные платы для фотоаппаратов
sv: Kretskort för kameror
tr: Fotoğraf Makinesi Aksesuar Setleri